Missouri, session 2026, SB1258.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
1 Section A. Section 169.070, RSMo, is repealed and one new
2 section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 169.070,
3 to read as follows:
1 169.070. 1. The retirement allowance of a member
2 whose age at retirement is sixty years or more and whose
3 creditable service is five years or more, or whose sum of
4 age and creditable service equals eighty years or more, or
5 who has attained age fifty-five and whose creditable service
6 is twenty-five years or more or whose creditable service is
7 thirty years or more regardless of age, may be the sum of
8 the following items, not to exceed one hundred percent of
9 the member's final average salary:
10 (1) Two and five-tenths percent of the member's final
11 average salary for each year of membership service;
12 (2) Six-tenths of the amount payable for a year of
13 membership service for each year of prior service not
14 exceeding thirty years.
15 In lieu of the retirement allowance otherwise provided in
16 subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection, a member may
17 elect to receive a retirement allowance of:

SB 1258 2
18 (3) Two and four-tenths percent of the member's final
19 average salary for each year of membership service, if the
20 member's creditable service is twenty-nine years or more but
21 less than thirty years, and the member has not attained age
22 fifty-five;
23 (4) Two and thirty-five-hundredths percent of the
24 member's final average salary for each year of membership
25 service, if the member's creditable service is twenty-eight
26 years or more but less than twenty-nine years, and the
27 member has not attained age fifty-five;
28 (5) Two and three-tenths percent of the member's final
29 average salary for each year of membership service, if the
30 member's creditable service is twenty-seven years or more
31 but less than twenty-eight years, and the member has not
32 attained age fifty-five;
33 (6) Two and twenty-five-hundredths percent of the
34 member's final average salary for each year of membership
35 service, if the member's creditable service is twenty-six
36 years or more but less than twenty-seven years, and the
37 member has not attained age fifty-five;
38 (7) Two and two-tenths percent of the member's final
39 average salary for each year of membership service, if the
40 member's creditable service is twenty-five years or more but
41 less than twenty-six years, and the member has not attained
42 age fifty-five;
43 (8) Two and fifty-five hundredths percent of the
44 member's final average salary for each year of membership
45 service, if the member's creditable service is thirty-two
46 years or more but less than thirty-three years, regardless
47 of age;
48 (9) Two and six-tenths percent of the member's final
49 average salary for each year of membership service, if the

SB 1258 3
50 member's creditable service is thirty-three years or more
51 regardless of age.
52 2. In lieu of the retirement allowance provided in
53 subsection 1 of this section, a member whose age is sixty
54 years or more on September 28, 1975, may elect to have the
55 member's retirement allowance calculated as a sum of the
56 following items:
57 (1) Sixty cents plus one and five-tenths percent of
58 the member's final average salary for each year of
59 membership service;
60 (2) Six-tenths of the amount payable for a year of
61 membership service for each year of prior service not
62 exceeding thirty years;
63 (3) Three-fourths of one percent of the sum of
64 subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection for each month
65 of attained age in excess of sixty years but not in excess
66 of age sixty-five.
67 3. (1) In lieu of the retirement allowance provided
68 either in subsection 1 or 2 of this section, collectively
69 called "option 1", a member whose creditable service is
70 twenty-five years or more or who has attained the age of
71 fifty-five with five or more years of creditable service may
72 elect in the member's application for retirement to receive
73 the actuarial equivalent of the member's retirement
74 allowance in reduced monthly payments for life during
75 retirement with the provision that:
76 Option 2.
77 Upon the member's death the reduced retirement
78 allowance shall be continued throughout the life of and paid
79 to such person as has an insurable interest in the life of
80 the member as the member shall have nominated in the
81 member's election of the option, and provided further that

SB 1258 4
82 if the person so nominated dies before the retired member,
83 the retirement allowance will be increased to the amount the
84 retired member would be receiving had the retired member
85 elected option 1; or
86 Option 3.
87 Upon the death of the member three-fourths of the
88 reduced retirement allowance shall be continued throughout
89 the life of and paid to such person as has an insurable
90 interest in the life of the member and as the member shall
91 have nominated in an election of the option, and provided
92 further that if the person so nominated dies before the
93 retired member, the retirement allowance will be increased
94 to the amount the retired member would be receiving had the
95 member elected option 1; or
96 Option 4.
97 Upon the death of the member one-half of the reduced
98 retirement allowance shall be continued throughout the life
99 of, and paid to, such person as has an insurable interest in
100 the life of the member and as the member shall have
101 nominated in an election of the option, and provided further
102 that if the person so nominated dies before the retired
103 member, the retirement allowance shall be increased to the
104 amount the retired member would be receiving had the member
105 elected option 1; or
106 Option 5.
107 Upon the death of the member prior to the member having
108 received one hundred twenty monthly payments of the member's
109 reduced allowance, the remainder of the one hundred twenty
110 monthly payments of the reduced allowance shall be paid to
111 such beneficiary as the member shall have nominated in the
112 member's election of the option or in a subsequent
113 nomination. If there is no beneficiary so nominated who

SB 1258 5
114 survives the member for the remainder of the one hundred
115 twenty monthly payments, the total of the remainder of such
116 one hundred twenty monthly payments shall be paid to the
117 surviving spouse, surviving children in equal shares,
118 surviving parents in equal shares, or estate of the last
119 person, in that order of precedence, to receive a monthly
120 allowance in a lump sum payment. If the total of the one
121 hundred twenty payments paid to the retired individual and
122 the beneficiary of the retired individual is less than the
123 total of the member's accumulated contributions, the
124 difference shall be paid to the beneficiary in a lump sum; or
125 Option 6.
126 Upon the death of the member prior to the member having
127 received sixty monthly payments of the member's reduced
128 allowance, the remainder of the sixty monthly payments of
129 the reduced allowance shall be paid to such beneficiary as
130 the member shall have nominated in the member's election of
131 the option or in a subsequent nomination. If there is no
132 beneficiary so nominated who survives the member for the
133 remainder of the sixty monthly payments, the total of the
134 remainder of such sixty monthly payments shall be paid to
135 the surviving spouse, surviving children in equal shares,
136 surviving parents in equal shares, or estate of the last
137 person, in that order of precedence, to receive a monthly
138 allowance in a lump sum payment. If the total of the sixty
139 payments paid to the retired individual and the beneficiary
140 of the retired individual is less than the total of the
141 member's accumulated contributions, the difference shall be
142 paid to the beneficiary in a lump sum.
143 (2) The election of an option may be made only in the
144 application for retirement and such application must be
145 filed prior to the date on which the retirement of the

SB 1258 6
146 member is to be effective. If either the member or the
147 person nominated to receive the survivorship payments dies
148 before the effective date of retirement, the option shall
149 not be effective, provided that:
150 (a) If the member or a person retired on disability
151 retirement dies after acquiring twenty-five or more years of
152 creditable service or after attaining the age of fifty-five
153 years and acquiring five or more years of creditable service
154 and before retirement, except retirement with disability
155 benefits, and the person named by the member as the member's
156 beneficiary has an insurable interest in the life of the
157 deceased member, the designated beneficiary may elect to
158 receive either survivorship benefits under option 2 or a
159 payment of the accumulated contributions of the member. If
160 survivorship benefits under option 2 are elected and the
161 member at the time of death would have been eligible to
162 receive an actuarial equivalent of the member's retirement
163 allowance, the designated beneficiary may further elect to
164 defer the option 2 payments until the date the member would
165 have been eligible to receive the retirement allowance
166 provided in subsection 1 or 2 of this section;
167 (b) If the member or a person retired on disability
168 retirement dies before attaining age fifty-five but after
169 acquiring five but fewer than twenty-five years of
170 creditable service, and the person named as the member's
171 beneficiary has an insurable interest in the life of the
172 deceased member, the designated beneficiary may elect to
173 receive either a payment of the member's accumulated
174 contributions, or survivorship benefits under option 2 to
175 begin on the date the member would first have been eligible
176 to receive an actuarial equivalent of the member's
177 retirement allowance, or to begin on the date the member

SB 1258 7
178 would first have been eligible to receive the retirement
179 allowance provided in subsection 1 or 2 of this section.
180 4. If the total of the retirement or disability
181 allowance paid to an individual before the death of the
182 individual is less than the accumulated contributions at the
183 time of retirement, the difference shall be paid to the
184 beneficiary of the individual, or to the surviving spouse,
185 surviving children in equal shares, surviving parents in
186 equal shares, or estate of the individual in that order of
187 precedence. If an optional benefit as provided in option 2,
188 3 or 4 in subsection 3 of this section had been elected, and
189 the beneficiary dies after receiving the optional benefit,
190 and if the total retirement allowance paid to the retired
191 individual and the beneficiary of the retired individual is
192 less than the total of the contributions, the difference
193 shall be paid to the surviving spouse, surviving children in
194 equal shares, surviving parents in equal shares, or estate
195 of the beneficiary, in that order of precedence, unless the
196 retired individual designates a different recipient with the
197 board at or after retirement.
198 5. If a member dies and his or her financial
199 institution is unable to accept the final payment or
200 payments due to the member, the final payment or payments
201 shall be paid to the beneficiary of the member or, if there
202 is no beneficiary, to the surviving spouse, surviving
203 children in equal shares, surviving parents in equal shares,
204 or estate of the member, in that order of precedence, unless
205 otherwise stated. If the beneficiary of a deceased member
206 dies and his or her financial institution is unable to
207 accept the final payment or payments, the final payment or
208 payments shall be paid to the surviving spouse, surviving
209 children in equal shares, surviving parents in equal shares,

SB 1258 8
210 or estate of the member, in that order of precedence, unless
211 otherwise stated.
212 6. If a member dies before receiving a retirement
213 allowance, the member's accumulated contributions at the
214 time of the death of the member shall be paid to the
215 beneficiary of the member or, if there is no beneficiary, to
216 the surviving spouse, surviving children in equal shares,
217 surviving parents in equal shares, or to the estate of the
218 member, in that order of precedence; except that, no such
219 payment shall be made if the beneficiary elects option 2 in
220 subsection 3 of this section, unless the beneficiary dies
221 before having received benefits pursuant to that subsection
222 equal to the accumulated contributions of the member, in
223 which case the amount of accumulated contributions in excess
224 of the total benefits paid pursuant to that subsection shall
225 be paid to the surviving spouse, surviving children in equal
226 shares, surviving parents in equal shares, or estate of the
227 beneficiary, in that order of precedence.
228 7. If a member ceases to be a public school employee
229 as herein defined and certifies to the board of trustees
230 that such cessation is permanent, or if the membership of
231 the person is otherwise terminated, the member shall be paid
232 the member's accumulated contributions with interest.
233 8. Notwithstanding any provisions of sections 169.010
234 to 169.141 to the contrary, if a member ceases to be a
235 public school employee after acquiring five or more years of
236 membership service in Missouri, the member may at the option
237 of the member leave the member's contributions with the
238 retirement system and claim a retirement allowance any time
239 after reaching the minimum age for voluntary retirement.
240 When the member's claim is presented to the board, the
241 member shall be granted an allowance as provided in sections

SB 1258 9
242 169.010 to 169.141 on the basis of the member's age, years
243 of service, and the provisions of the law in effect at the
244 time the member requests the member's retirement to become
245 effective.
246 9. The retirement allowance of a member retired
247 because of disability shall be nine-tenths of the allowance
248 to which the member's creditable service would entitle the
249 member if the member's age were sixty, or fifty percent of
250 one-twelfth of the annual salary rate used in determining
251 the member's contributions during the last school year for
252 which the member received a year of creditable service
253 immediately prior to the member's disability, whichever is
254 greater, except that no such allowance shall exceed the
255 retirement allowance to which the member would have been
256 entitled upon retirement at age sixty if the member had
257 continued to teach from the date of disability until age
258 sixty at the same salary rate.
259 10. Notwithstanding any provisions of sections 169.010
260 to 169.141 to the contrary, from October 13, 1961, the
261 contribution rate pursuant to sections 169.010 to 169.141
262 shall be multiplied by the factor of two-thirds for any
263 member of the system for whom federal Old Age and Survivors
264 Insurance tax is paid from state or local tax funds on
265 account of the member's employment entitling the person to
266 membership in the system. The monetary benefits for a
267 member who elected not to exercise an option to pay into the
268 system a retroactive contribution of four percent on that
269 part of the member's annual salary rate which was in excess
270 of four thousand eight hundred dollars but not in excess of
271 eight thousand four hundred dollars for each year of
272 employment in a position covered by this system between July
273 1, 1957, and July 1, 1961, as provided in subsection 10 of

SB 1258 10
274 this section as it appears in RSMo, 1969, shall be the sum
275 of:
276 (1) For years of service prior to July 1, 1946, six-
277 tenths of the full amount payable for years of membership
278 service;
279 (2) For years of membership service after July 1,
280 1946, in which the full contribution rate was paid, full
281 benefits under the formula in effect at the time of the
282 member's retirement;
283 (3) For years of membership service after July 1,
284 1957, and prior to July 1, 1961, the benefits provided in
285 this section as it appears in RSMo, 1959; except that if the
286 member has at least thirty years of creditable service at
287 retirement the member shall receive the benefit payable
288 pursuant to that section as though the member's age were
289 sixty-five at retirement;
290 (4) For years of membership service after July 1,
291 1961, in which the two-thirds contribution rate was paid,
292 two-thirds of the benefits under the formula in effect at
293 the time of the member's retirement.
294 11. The monetary benefits for each other member for
295 whom federal Old Age and Survivors Insurance tax is or was
296 paid at any time from state or local funds on account of the
297 member's employment entitling the member to membership in
298 the system shall be the sum of:
299 (1) For years of service prior to July 1, 1946, six-
300 tenths of the full amount payable for years of membership
301 service;
302 (2) For years of membership service after July 1,
303 1946, in which the full contribution rate was paid, full
304 benefits under the formula in effect at the time of the
305 member's retirement;

SB 1258 11
306 (3) For years of membership service after July 1,
307 1957, in which the two-thirds contribution rate was paid,
308 two-thirds of the benefits under the formula in effect at
309 the time of the member's retirement.
310 12. Any retired member of the system who was retired
311 prior to September 1, 1972, or beneficiary receiving
312 payments under option 1 or option 2 of subsection 3 of this
313 section, as such option existed prior to September 1, 1972,
314 will be eligible to receive an increase in the retirement
315 allowance of the member of two percent for each year, or
316 major fraction of more than one-half of a year, which the
317 retired member has been retired prior to July 1, 1975. This
318 increased amount shall be payable commencing with January,
319 1976, and shall thereafter be referred to as the member's
320 retirement allowance. The increase provided for in this
321 subsection shall not affect the retired member's eligibility
322 for compensation provided for in section 169.580 or 169.585,
323 nor shall the amount being paid pursuant to these sections
324 be reduced because of any increases provided for in this
325 section.
326 13. If the board of trustees determines that the cost
327 of living, as measured by generally accepted standards,
328 increases two percent or more in the preceding fiscal year,
329 the board shall increase the retirement allowances which the
330 retired members or beneficiaries are receiving by two
331 percent of the amount being received by the retired member
332 or the beneficiary at the time the annual increase is
333 granted by the board with the provision that the increases
334 provided for in this subsection shall not become effective
335 until the fourth January first following the member's
336 retirement or January 1, 1977, whichever later occurs, or in
337 the case of any member retiring on or after July 1, 2000,

SB 1258 12
338 the increase provided for in this subsection shall not
339 become effective until the third January first following the
340 member's retirement, or in the case of any member retiring
341 on or after July 1, 2001, the increase provided for in this
342 subsection shall not become effective until the second
343 January first following the member's retirement. Commencing
344 with January 1, 1992, if the board of trustees determines
345 that the cost of living has increased five percent or more
346 in the preceding fiscal year, the board shall increase the
347 retirement allowances by five percent. The total of the
348 increases granted to a retired member or the beneficiary
349 after December 31, 1976, may not exceed eighty percent of
350 the retirement allowance established at retirement or as
351 previously adjusted by other subsections. If the cost of
352 living increases less than five percent, the board of
353 trustees may determine the percentage of increase to be made
354 in retirement allowances, but at no time can the increase
355 exceed five percent per year. If the cost of living
356 decreases in a fiscal year, there will be no increase in
357 allowances for retired members on the following January
358 first.
359 14. The board of trustees may reduce the amounts which
360 have been granted as increases to a member pursuant to
361 subsection 13 of this section if the cost of living, as
362 determined by the board and as measured by generally
363 accepted standards, is less than the cost of living was at
364 the time of the first increase granted to the member; except
365 that, the reductions shall not exceed the amount of
366 increases which have been made to the member's allowance
367 after December 31, 1976.
368 15. Any application for retirement shall include a
369 sworn statement by the member certifying that the spouse of

SB 1258 13
370 the member at the time the application was completed was
371 aware of the application and the plan of retirement elected
372 in the application.
373 16. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any
374 person retired prior to September 28, 1983, who is receiving
375 a reduced retirement allowance under option 1 or option 2 of
376 subsection 3 of this section, as such option existed prior
377 to September 28, 1983, and whose beneficiary nominated to
378 receive continued retirement allowance payments under the
379 elected option dies or has died, shall upon application to
380 the board of trustees have his or her retirement allowance
381 increased to the amount he or she would have been receiving
382 had the option not been elected, actuarially adjusted to
383 recognize any excessive benefits which would have been paid
384 to him or her up to the time of application.
385 17. Benefits paid pursuant to the provisions of the
386 public school retirement system of Missouri shall not exceed
387 the limitations of Section 415 of Title 26 of the United
388 States Code except as provided pursuant to this subsection.
389 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the board of
390 trustees may establish a benefit plan pursuant to Section
391 415(m) of Title 26 of the United States Code. Such plan
392 shall be created solely for the purpose described in Section
393 415(m)(3)(A) of Title 26 of the United States Code. The
394 board of trustees may promulgate regulations necessary to
395 implement the provisions of this subsection and to create
396 and administer such benefit plan.
397 18. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
398 contrary, any person retired before, on, or after May 26,
399 1994, shall be made, constituted, appointed and employed by
400 the board as a special consultant on the matters of
401 education, retirement and aging, and upon request shall give

SB 1258 14
402 written or oral opinions to the board in response to such
403 requests. As compensation for such duties the person shall
404 receive an amount based on the person's years of service so
405 that the total amount received pursuant to sections 169.010
406 to 169.141 shall be at least the minimum amounts specified
407 in subdivisions (1) to (4) of this subsection. In
408 determining the minimum amount to be received, the amounts
409 in subdivisions (3) and (4) of this subsection shall be
410 adjusted in accordance with the actuarial adjustment, if
411 any, that was applied to the person's retirement allowance.
412 In determining the minimum amount to be received, beginning
413 September 1, 1996, the amounts in subdivisions (1) and (2)
414 of this subsection shall be adjusted in accordance with the
415 actuarial adjustment, if any, that was applied to the
416 person's retirement allowance due to election of an optional
417 form of retirement having a continued monthly payment after
418 the person's death. Notwithstanding any other provision of
419 law to the contrary, no person retired before, on, or after
420 May 26, 1994, and no beneficiary of such a person, shall
421 receive a retirement benefit pursuant to sections 169.010 to
422 169.141 based on the person's years of service less than the
423 following amounts:
424 (1) Thirty or more years of service, one thousand two
425 hundred dollars;
426 (2) At least twenty-five years but less than thirty
427 years, one thousand dollars;
428 (3) At least twenty years but less than twenty-five
429 years, eight hundred dollars;
430 (4) At least fifteen years but less than twenty years,
431 six hundred dollars.
432 19. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the
433 contrary, any person retired prior to May 26, 1994, and any

SB 1258 15
434 designated beneficiary of such a retired member who was
435 deceased prior to July 1, 1999, shall be made, constituted,
436 appointed and employed by the board as a special consultant
437 on the matters of education, retirement or aging and upon
438 request shall give written or oral opinions to the board in
439 response to such requests. Beginning September 1, 1996, as
440 compensation for such service, the member shall have added,
441 pursuant to this subsection, to the member's monthly annuity
442 as provided by this section a dollar amount equal to the
443 lesser of sixty dollars or the product of two dollars
444 multiplied by the member's number of years of creditable
445 service. Beginning September 1, 1999, the designated
446 beneficiary of the deceased member shall as compensation for
447 such service have added, pursuant to this subsection, to the
448 monthly annuity as provided by this section a dollar amount
449 equal to the lesser of sixty dollars or the product of two
450 dollars multiplied by the member's number of years of
451 creditable service. The total compensation provided by this
452 section including the compensation provided by this
453 subsection shall be used in calculating any future cost-of-
454 living adjustments provided by subsection 13 of this section.
455 20. Any member who has retired prior to July 1, 1998,
456 and the designated beneficiary of a deceased retired member
457 shall be made, constituted, appointed and employed by the
458 board as a special consultant on the matters of education,
459 retirement and aging, and upon request shall give written or
460 oral opinions to the board in response to such requests. As
461 compensation for such duties the person shall receive a
462 payment equivalent to eight and seven-tenths percent of the
463 previous month's benefit, which shall be added to the
464 member's or beneficiary's monthly annuity and which shall
465 not be subject to the provisions of subsections 13 and 14 of

SB 1258 16
466 this section for the purposes of the limit on the total
467 amount of increases which may be received.
468 21. Any member who has retired shall be made,
469 constituted, appointed and employed by the board as a
470 special consultant on the matters of education, retirement
471 and aging, and upon request shall give written or oral
472 opinions to the board in response to such request. As
473 compensation for such duties, the beneficiary of the retired
474 member, or, if there is no beneficiary, the surviving
475 spouse, surviving children in equal shares, surviving
476 parents in equal shares, or estate of the retired member, in
477 that order of precedence, shall receive as a part of
478 compensation for these duties a death benefit of five
479 thousand dollars.
480 22. Any member who has retired prior to July 1, 1999,
481 and the designated beneficiary of a retired member who was
482 deceased prior to July 1, 1999, shall be made, constituted,
483 appointed and employed by the board as a special consultant
484 on the matters of education, retirement and aging, and upon
485 request shall give written or oral opinions to the board in
486 response to such requests. As compensation for such duties,
487 the person shall have added, pursuant to this subsection, to
488 the monthly annuity as provided by this section a dollar
489 amount equal to five dollars times the member's number of
490 years of creditable service.
491 23. Any member who has retired prior to July 1, 2000,
492 and the designated beneficiary of a deceased retired member
493 shall be made, constituted, appointed and employed by the
494 board as a special consultant on the matters of education,
495 retirement and aging, and upon request shall give written or
496 oral opinions to the board in response to such requests. As
497 compensation for such duties, the person shall receive a

SB 1258 17
498 payment equivalent to three and five-tenths percent of the
499 previous month's benefit, which shall be added to the member
500 or beneficiary's monthly annuity and which shall not be
501 subject to the provisions of subsections 13 and 14 of this
502 section for the purposes of the limit on the total amount of
503 increases which may be received.
504 24. Any member who has retired prior to July 1, 2001,
505 and the designated beneficiary of a deceased retired member
506 shall be made, constituted, appointed and employed by the
507 board as a special consultant on the matters of education,
508 retirement and aging, and upon request shall give written or
509 oral opinions to the board in response to such requests. As
510 compensation for such duties, the person shall receive a
511 dollar amount equal to three dollars times the member's
512 number of years of creditable service, which shall be added
513 to the member's or beneficiary's monthly annuity and which
514 shall not be subject to the provisions of subsections 13 and
515 14 of this section for the purposes of the limit on the
516 total amount of increases which may be received.
✓